Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5434.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to prescribe a privilege tax for the use of public roads and highways of this state by motor carriers by imposing a specific tax upon on the use of motor fuel, alternative fuel, and electric fuel within this state; to provide for certain credits against this tax and certain mechanisms for paying, collecting, and enforcing this tax; to provide for the licensing of motor carriers and for exemptions from licensure; to require the keeping and providing for the examination of certain reports; to provide review procedures for the assessment of the tax and revocation of a license; to impose certain duties upon on and confer certain powers to certain state departments and agencies; to prescribe certain penalties for the violation of this act; to provide for the promulgation of rules; and to make appropriations. Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Alternative fuel" means that term as defined in section 151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151. (b) "Alternative fuel dealer" means that term as defined in section 151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151. (c) "Axle" means any 2 or more load-carrying wheels mounted in a single transverse vertical plane. (d) "Commissioner" means the state treasurer. (e) "Department" means the department of treasury. (f) "Electric fuel" means that term as defined in section 157 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1157. (g) (f) "Gallon equivalent " equivalent of alternative fuel" means gallon equivalent as that term as is defined in section 151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151. (h) (g) "Motor carrier" means either of the following: (i) A person who operates or causes to be operated a qualified commercial motor vehicle on a public road or highway in this state and at least 1 other state or Canadian province. (ii) A person who operates or causes to be operated a qualified commercial motor vehicle on a public road or highway in this state and who is licensed under the international fuel tax agreement. (i) (h) "Motor fuel" means diesel fuel as defined in section 2 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1002. Beginning on January 1, 2017, motor fuel includes gasoline as that term is defined in section 3 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1003. (j) (i) "Nonprofit private, parochial, denominational, or public school, college, or university" means an elementary, secondary, or postsecondary educational facility. (k) (j) "Person" means a natural person, partnership, firm, association, joint stock company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, syndicate, or corporation, and any receiver, trustee, conservator, or officer, other than a unit of government, having jurisdiction and control of property by virtue of law or by appointment of a court. (l) (k) "Public roads or highways" means a road, street, or place maintained by this state or a political subdivision of this state and generally open to use by the public as a matter of right for the purpose of vehicular travel, notwithstanding that they may be temporarily closed or travel restricted for the purpose of construction, maintenance, repair, or reconstruction. (m) (l) "Qualified commercial motor vehicle", subject to subdivision (m), (n), means a motor vehicle used, designed, or maintained for transportation of persons or property and to which 1 of the following applies: (i) Having Has 3 or more axles regardless of weight. (ii) Having Has 2 axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms. (iii) Is used in a combination of vehicles, if the weight of that combination exceeds 26,000 pounds or 11,797 kilograms gross vehicle or registered gross vehicle weight. (n) (m) "Qualified Qualified commercial motor vehicle " vehicle does not include a recreational vehicle, a road tractor, truck, or truck tractor used exclusively in this state, a road tractor, truck, or truck tractor owned by a farmer and used in connection with the farmer's farming operation and not used for hire, a school bus, a bus defined and certificated under the motor bus transportation act, 1982 PA 432, MCL 474.101 to 474.139, or a bus operated by a public transit agency operating under any of the following: (i) A county, city, township, or village as provided by law, or other authority incorporated under 1963 PA 55, MCL 124.351 to 124.359. Each authority and governmental agency incorporated under 1963 PA 55, MCL 124.351 to 124.359, has the exclusive jurisdiction to determine its own contemplated routes, hours of service, estimated transit vehicle miles, costs of public transportation services, and projected capital improvements or projects within its service area. (ii) An authority incorporated under the metropolitan transportation authorities act of 1967, 1967 PA 204, MCL 124.401 to 124.426, or that operates a transportation service pursuant to an interlocal agreement under the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512. (iii) A contract entered into under 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 8, MCL 124.531 to 124.536, or 1951 PA 35, MCL 124.1 to 124.13. (iv) An authority incorporated under the public transportation authority act, 1986 PA 196, MCL 124.451 to 124.479, or a nonprofit corporation organized under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, that provides transportation services. (v) An authority financing public improvements to transportation systems under the revenue bond act of 1933, 1933 PA 94, MCL 141.101 to 141.140. (o) (n) Qualified commercial motor vehicle includes a vehicle operated on a public road or highway owned by a farmer and used in connection with the farmer's farming operation if the vehicle bears out of state registration plates of a state that does not give similar treatment to vehicles from this state. Sec. 2. (1) A motor carrier licensed under this act shall pay a road tax calculated on the amount of motor fuel, electric fuel, and alternative fuel consumed in qualified commercial motor vehicles on the public roads or highways within this state. Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6), subsections (6) and (7), the tax shall be at the rate of 15 cents per gallon on motor fuel consumed on the public roads or highways within this state. In addition, qualified commercial motor vehicles licensed under this act that travel in interstate commerce are subject to the definition of taxable motor fuels, electric fuels, and alternative fuels and rates as defined by the respective international fuel tax agreement member jurisdictions. A motor carrier licensed under this act shall file a return and pay the tax due quarterly to the department on or before the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year on a form prescribed and furnished by the department. Each quarterly return and tax payment shall must cover the liability for the annual quarter ending on the last day of the preceding month. (2) The amount of motor fuel or alternative fuel consumed in the operation of a motor carrier on public roads or highways within this state shall must be determined by dividing the miles traveled within this state by the average miles per gallon of motor fuel or applicable gallon equivalent of alternative fuel. The average miles per gallon of motor fuel or per-gallon equivalent of alternative fuel, as applicable, shall must be determined by dividing the miles traveled within and outside of this state by the total amount of motor fuel or alternative fuel consumed within and outside of this state. (3) In the absence of records showing the average number of miles operated per gallon of motor fuel or per-gallon equivalent of alternative fuel, as applicable, it is presumed that 1 gallon of motor fuel or applicable gallon equivalent of alternative fuel is consumed for every 4 miles traveled. (4) The quarterly tax return shall must be accompanied by a remittance covering any tax due. (5) The If the commissioner , when he or she considers it necessary to ensure payment of the tax or to provide a more efficient administration of the tax, the commissioner may require the filing of returns and payment of the tax for other than quarterly periods. (6) Beginning January 1, 2017 and annually thereafter, the per-gallon or per-gallon equivalent rate of tax under this act for motor fuel or alternative fuel consumed on the public roads or highways of this state is 1 of the following: (a) For motor fuel, the applicable rate prescribed under section 8(1) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, for the same period. (b) For alternative fuel, the rate prescribed under section 152 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1152, for the same period. (7) For electric fuel, the amount of road tax owed for a time period must be calculated by multiplying the electric fuel rate by the amount of miles driven on this state's public roads during that time period by the motor carrier's qualified commercial vehicles that consume electric fuel. The electric fuel rate must be calculated by dividing the rate prescribed under section 8(1) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, for the same period by the motor carrier's average miles per gallon equivalent for all vehicles in the motor carrier's fleet that consume electric fuel. Sec. 2a. (1) The department, on behalf of this state, may enter into a reciprocal agreement providing for the imposition of a motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel tax on an apportionment or allocation basis with the proper authority of a state, a commonwealth, the District of Columbia, a state or province of a foreign country, or a territory or possession either of the United States or of a foreign country. Under this subsection, the department shall enter into the international fuel tax agreement. (2) The department may promulgate rules to implement and enforce the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement. Rules promulgated under this subsection shall must be promulgated under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) As required by the intermodal surface transportation efficiency act of 1991, Public Law 102-240, 105 Stat 1914, if the department entered into the international fuel tax agreement, and if the provisions set forth in that agreement are different from this act, then the provisions of the agreement shall control. (4) This section constitutes complete authority for the imposition of motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel taxes upon on an apportionment or allocation basis. Sec. 5. (1) A person required to be licensed by this act shall not act as a motor carrier in this state unless the person is the holder of an unrevoked license issued by the department or is the holder of an unrevoked license issued under the international fuel tax agreement by this state or another member jurisdiction of the international fuel tax agreement. To procure a license, a motor carrier shall file with the department a verified application upon on a form prescribed and to be furnished by the department. The application shall must contain the name and address of the motor carrier and, if a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the names and addresses of the persons constituting the firm, partnership, association, joint stock company, limited liability company, syndicate, or corporation, the name of its resident agent, the location of its predominant place of business, both within and outside of this state, and other pertinent information the department may require. (2) The department shall issue to each motor carrier 1 license per person and 2 decals for each qualified commercial motor vehicle. A decal shall must be affixed respectively to the right-hand side and left-hand side of the cab of every a qualified commercial motor vehicle while it is being operated in this state by each person licensed under this act. A copy of the license shall must be carried in each the cab while it the qualified commercial motor vehicle is being operated. (3) For cause, a motor carrier may be required to file with the department a surety bond payable to this state, upon on which the applicant is the obligor, in the sum of 3 times the highest estimated quarterly tax, or $1,000.00, whichever is greater. This surety bond shall be is conditioned upon on the applicant complying with this act and with the rules promulgated under this act, promptly filing true reports, and paying the taxes, interest, and penalties required by this act. Each surety bond shall must be approved as to amount and sureties by the department. The department may accept cash or securities instead of a surety bond. (4) The commissioner may waive the bond requirement for a motor carrier exempt from the reporting requirements of section 2 when if the collection of taxes would not be impaired by lack of security of a bond required by this section. (5) The license and decals are not assignable or transferable to another person and are valid only for the person in whose name they are issued. However, upon on application to the department, a motor carrier, upon on the sale, conveyance, disposal, or replacement of a qualified commercial motor vehicle, may transfer the license and decals for that qualified commercial motor vehicle to another qualified commercial motor vehicle of the motor carrier that is required to be licensed under this act. The department shall issue replacement decals for the newly licensed qualified commercial motor vehicle that authorizes the holder of the qualified commercial motor vehicle license to use and consume motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel in the qualified commercial motor vehicle upon on the public roads or highways of this state until the original license would have expired. The department may require the payment of a fee to cover the administrative costs of issuing a replacement license or decals. (6) Upon On filing of the application and upon on posting of any bond as required, the department shall issue to the applicant a license and decals that authorize the holder to operate qualified commercial motor vehicles using and consuming motor fuels, electric fuels, or alternative fuels upon on the public roads or highways of this state until January 1 of the year following the date of issuance. (7) If a licensee ceases to engage in business within this state, the licensee shall notify the department in writing within 15 days after discontinuance. Sec. 8. (1) Every A qualified commercial motor vehicle leased to a motor carrier is subject to this act to the same extent and in the same manner as a qualified commercial motor vehicle owned by a motor carrier. (2) A lessor of qualified commercial motor vehicles may be considered a motor carrier with respect to qualified commercial motor vehicles leased to others, if the lessor supplies or pays for the motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel consumed by the vehicles or bills rental or other charges calculated to include the cost of motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel. A lessee motor carrier may exclude a qualified commercial motor vehicle leased from others from the reports and liabilities required by this act if that qualified commercial motor vehicle has been leased from a lessor who is a motor carrier under this act and the lease agreement provides for the lessor to pay the cost of motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel and motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel taxes. (3) Upon On application by a licensed motor carrier, the department may authorize a licensed motor carrier leasing qualified commercial motor vehicles from 2 or more lessors to file consolidated reports for these lessors. (4) This section governs the primary liability under this act of lessors and lessees of qualified commercial motor vehicles. For tax liabilities incurred before April 1, 2005, if a lessor or lessee primarily liable fails, in whole or in part, to discharge his or her that person's tax liability, the failing party and the other lessor or lessee party to the transaction are jointly and severally responsible and liable for compliance with this act and for the payment of tax due. However, the aggregate of taxes collected from a lessor and lessee by this state under this act shall must not exceed the total amount of taxes due and costs and penalties imposed. (5) For tax liabilities arising after April 1, 2005, if a lease agreement identifies a party responsible for the payment of taxes, the nonresponsible party under the lease shall obtain a copy of the responsible party's valid international fuel tax agreement registration and keep the copy on file. If the nonresponsible party does not obtain a copy of the responsible party's valid international fuel tax agreement registration and the responsible party fails in whole or in part to discharge his or her the responsible party's tax liability, then the responsible and nonresponsible parties are jointly and severally responsible and liable for compliance with this act and payment of tax due. If the lease agreement does not identify the party responsible for payment of fuel taxes under this act, then both parties are jointly and severally responsible and liable for compliance with this act and payment of tax due. However, the aggregate of taxes collected from a lessor and lessee by this state under this act shall must not exceed the total amount of taxes due and costs and penalties imposed. If the nonresponsible party under the lease maintains a copy of the responsible party's valid international fuel tax agreement registration on file, the nonresponsible party has no responsibility or liability for compliance with this act or payment of any taxes, costs, or penalties due under this act relating to the motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel consumed under the lease. Sec. 9. The department may examine the books, invoices, receipts, records, and papers of a motor carrier, fuel supplier, or alternative fuel dealer that pertain to the motor fuel, electric fuel, or alternative fuel received, used, purchased, shipped, or delivered to verify the truth and accuracy of any statement, report, or return. Sec. 10. Each motor carrier shall maintain and keep, for a period of at least not less than 4 years, suitable books, records, and accounts of all motor fuel, electric fuel, and alternative fuel purchased, sold, dispensed, or used, together with all invoices, delivery tickets, bills of lading, and other pertinent records and papers as required by the department for the administration of this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5433 (request no. H00427'25 a). (b) House Bill No. 5435 (request no. H00609'25).